Utah statutes.
41-12a-511.   Failure to satisfy judgment.

(1)  Whenever any person fails within 60 days to satisfy any judgment, it is the duty of the clerk of the court or of the judge of a court which has no clerk in which any such judgment is rendered in Utah, upon the written request of the judgment creditor or his attorney, to forward to the department immediately after the expiration of the 60 days, a certified copy of the judgment.

(2)  The department, upon the receipt of a certified copy of a judgment, shall suspend the license and registration and any nonresident's operating privilege of any person against whom the judgment was rendered, except as provided in Subsection (5) and Section 41-12a-513.

(3)  Except as provided under Subsection (5) and Section 41-12a-513, a license, registration, and nonresident's operating privilege suspended under Subsection (2) remains suspended and may not be renewed nor may that license or registration be thereafter issued in the name of the same person, including a person not previously licensed, unless every such judgment is stayed or satisfied in full within the meaning of Section 41-12a-512, and until the person files proof of owner's or operator's security.

(4)  If the judgment debtor named in any certified copy of a judgment reported to the department is a nonresident, the department shall transmit a certified copy of the judgment to the official in charge of the issuance of licenses and registration certificates of the state of which the judgment debtor is a resident.

(5)  If the judgment creditor consents in writing, in a form the department prescribes, that the judgment debtor be allowed license and registration or nonresident's operating privilege, they may be allowed by the department for six months from the date of the consent and thereafter until that consent is revoked in writing, notwithstanding the default in the payment of the judgment or of any installments thereof prescribed in Section 41-12a-513, if the judgment debtor furnishes proof of owner's security.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

